District of Columbia statutes.
16-5101

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Identifying information” means any information which would reasonable lead someone to be able to communicate with or contact a citizen without his or her prior permission.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-272, § 3(b), 54 DCR 856